Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.130

Bonds sole obligation of district.

No bonds issued by or on behalf of a community facilities district are obligations of any city, town, county, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof other than the district and the bonds must so state.

[ 2010 c 7 s 504.]